apertium-fra-spa.fra.metadix
    <pardef n="décri/re__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ra</l>               <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rai</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raient</l>           <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rais</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rais</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rait</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ras</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l>               <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rez</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riez</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rions</l>            <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rons</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ront</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l>                <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l>                <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l>               <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ts</l>               <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vaient</l>           <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vais</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vais</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vait</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vant</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vant</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l>               <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l>               <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vent</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vent</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ves</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vez</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vez</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vez</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viez</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viez</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vions</l>            <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vions</l>            <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>virent</l>           <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vis</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vis</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>visse</l>            <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vissent</l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>visses</l>           <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vissiez</l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vissions</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vit</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vons</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vons</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vons</l>             <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vîmes</l>            <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vît</l>              <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vîtes</l>            <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="décrire">                        <i>décri</i><par n="décri/re__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="écrire">                         <i>écri</i><par n="décri/re__vblex"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="écrire">                  <p><l>Ecri</l><r>écri</r></p><par n="décri/re__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inscrire">                       <i>inscri</i><par n="décri/re__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inscrire au procès-verbal" a="eleka"><i>inscri</i><par n="décri/re__vblex"/><p><l><b/>au<b/>procès-verbal</l><r><g><b/>au<b/>procès-verbal</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="inscrire sur">                   <i>inscri</i><par n="décri/re__vblex"/><p><l><b/>sur</l><r><g><b/>sur</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="prescrire" a="eleka">            <i>prescri</i><par n="décri/re__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="souscrire">                      <i>souscri</i><par n="décri/re__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="souscrire à des actions" a="eleka"><i>souscri</i><par n="décri/re__vblex"/><p><l><b/>à<b/>des<b/>actions</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>des<b/>actions</g></r></p></e>
